Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF626.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2294YH (2) 91 sc/js H.F. 626 Section 1. Section 35D.7, Code 2025, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 4. a. An Iowa veterans home members fund 3 is created in the state treasury under the control of the 4 department. The fund shall consist of moneys appropriated to 5 the fund by the general assembly and any other moneys available 6 to and obtained or accepted by the department from the federal 7 government or private sources for deposit in the fund. Moneys 8 in the fund are appropriated to the department for the purposes 9 of this subsection. Notwithstanding section 12C.7, interest 10 or earnings on moneys in the Iowa veterans home members fund 11 shall be credited to the Iowa veterans home members fund. 12 Notwithstanding section 8.33, moneys remaining in the Iowa 13 veterans home members fund at the end of a fiscal year shall 14 not revert to the general fund of the state. 15 b. If sufficient moneys are available, the department shall 16 use the moneys from the Iowa veterans home members fund to 17 provide a forty-five dollar monthly stipend to each member of 18 the Iowa veterans home who receives Medicaid benefits. 19